Illinois, session 104th, HB2216.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rebuild Illinois Mental Health Workforce 5Act is amended by changing Section 20-1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 66/20-1)7    Sec. 20-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Rebuild Illinois Mental Health Workforce Act. References 9in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.)